Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 3. Independent Candidates

§ 2401.
Applicability of subchapter.

A person may be nominated and have his or her name printed on the general election ballot for any office by filing a consent similar in form to the consent prescribed by section 2361 of this title and a statement of nomination with the Secretary of State. In the case of a nomination for justice of the peace, the consent form and statement of nomination shall be filed with the town clerk.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1995, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2402.
Requisites of statement.

A statement of nomination shall contain:

The name of the office for which the nomination is made.

The candidate’s name and residence.

If desired, a name, or other identification (in not more than three words) to be printed on the ballot following the candidate’s name.

In the case of nomination for President or Vice President of the United States:

The name and state of residence of each candidate for such office, together with the name, town of residence, and correct mailing address of each nominee for the office of elector.

The original statement of nomination shall include a certification by the town clerk of each town where the signers appear to be voters that the persons whose names appear as signers of the statement are registered voters in the town and of the total number of valid signers from the town.
(B) (i) The original statement of nomination shall include a certification by the town clerk of each town where the signers appear to be voters that the persons whose names appear as signers of the statement are registered voters in the town and of the total number of valid signers from the town.

Only the number of signers certified as registered voters by each town clerk on the original statement of nomination forms shall count toward the required number of signatures.

The statement shall also be accompanied by a consent form from each nominee for elector. The consent form shall be similar to the consent form prescribed in section 2361 of this title.

To constitute a valid nomination, a statement shall contain signatures of voters qualified to vote in an election for the office in question, equal in number to at least:
(b) (1) To constitute a valid nomination, a statement shall contain signatures of voters qualified to vote in an election for the office in question, equal in number to at least:

for presidential and vice presidential offices, 1,000;

for State and congressional offices, 500;

for county officers or State Senators, 100;

for Representative to the General Assembly, 50;

for justice of the peace, 30 or one percent of the legal voters of the municipality, whichever is less.

Signatures need not all be contained on one paper.

A statement shall state that each signer is qualified to vote in an election for the office in question and that the voter’s residence is as set forth next to the voter’s name.

A statement of nomination and a completed and signed consent form shall be filed:
(d) (1) A statement of nomination and a completed and signed consent form shall be filed:

in the case of nomination for President or Vice President of the United States, not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the August 1 preceding the presidential general election;

in the case of nomination for justice of the peace, not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the third day following the primary election; or

in the case of any other independent candidate, not earlier than the fourth Monday in April and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the Thursday preceding the primary election prescribed by section 2351 of this chapter, and not later than 5:00 p.m. of the third day prior to the day of a special primary election.

A public official receiving nominations shall not accept a petition unless a completed and signed consent form is filed at the same time.

A statement of nomination shall apply only to the election cycle in which the statement of nomination is filed.

The Secretary of State shall prescribe and furnish forms for a statement of nomination.

In the event that an independent vice presidential candidate withdraws in accordance with section 2412 of this chapter, the presidential candidate may submit to the Secretary of State on or before the ballot printing deadline a new consent form signed by the presidential candidate and his or her new vice presidential candidate.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 30-32;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1995, No. 95

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2007, No. 54

, § 3;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 6, 2008;

2009, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. April 7, 2010;

2009, No. 98

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 10, 2010;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 17a, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2015, No. 30

, § 7, eff. Jan. 1, 2016;

2017, No. 50

, § 17.

§ 2403.
Number of candidates; party names.

A statement of nomination shall contain the name of only one candidate, except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates, who may be nominated by means of the same statement of nomination.
(a) (1) A statement of nomination shall contain the name of only one candidate, except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates, who may be nominated by means of the same statement of nomination.

A single statement of nomination shall contain only one office for which a person seeks to be a candidate.

The political or other name on a statement of nomination shall be substantially different from the name of any organized political party. It shall also be substantially different from the political or other name already appearing on any other statement of nomination for the same office then on file with the same officer for the same election.
(b) (1) The political or other name on a statement of nomination shall be substantially different from the name of any organized political party. It shall also be substantially different from the political or other name already appearing on any other statement of nomination for the same office then on file with the same officer for the same election.

If the Secretary of State determines that it is not substantially different, the candidate named on the statement shall select a different political or other name; otherwise the Secretary shall print the word “Independent” on the ballot for that candidate.

Except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates, the word “independent” may not be used as part of a party name.
(c) (1) Except in the case of presidential and vice presidential candidates, the word “independent” may not be used as part of a party name.

If no party is indicated, the word “Independent” shall be printed on the ballot.

A candidate appearing on the ballot as a candidate of a political party shall not also appear on the ballot as an “Independent.”

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2001, No. 5

, § 15;

2017, No. 50

, § 18;

2019, No. 67

, § 10.

§ 2404.
Preservation of statements.

The Secretary of State shall preserve all statements until three months after the general election, after which they may be destroyed.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.